Arkansas, session 2025, SB365.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 3-5-1405(a)(8), concerning the number of
taprooms the holder of a small brewery license may operate is amended to read
as follows:
(8) Operates no more than two (2) three (3) small brewery tap
rooms taprooms; and









*CRH226*
03/04/2025 8:44:57 AM CRH226